hyph_be_BY@tarask.dic
хса3ж
хсак3
х2св
хс4п
х2ср
хс4т
хсь2
2х1т2
хт3в
х2тон
х3тр
1ху
3ху.
ху4ко
хут3к
2хф
х3х
2х1ц
2х1ч
2х3ш2
х4шт
хэ4
х1эл
1ца
ца4бу
ца2г3л
ца1д4
ца3дн
ца1зн
ца3к
цап3л
ца2пэ
ца3ўл
цаці3
ц2вы
2цг
ц1д
1це
2цеб
2цег
3цее
2цеж
цез2
цеі2
3цей
3цела
4целюц
4ценк
3ценьк
2це1р
3церн
3церу
3церы
4цесе
це3т2
3цеў
це3ўк
3цею
1цё
3цёв
3цёл
3цём
3цён
3цёра
3цёрк
3цёў
3цёх
4ц1з
1ці
ціг4л
3ціго
3ці3гр
ці3д2
2ціж
ці3к4
4цілае
4цілай
4цілал
4цілан
4цілаў
4цілах
4цілац
4цілач
4цілаю
4цілу
4цілы
2ціпл
ці3пр
3цірач
3ціру
ціс4тах
ці3сто
ці3стр
цісь4ц
ці3ўр
2цк
3ц2кав
цк3в
ц3кл
ц3к4н
3ц2ко
ц2куе
ц4куё
ц2куй
ц4куюц
ц2куя
2цл
ц2м
ц3ма
2ц3ме
ц3му
2цн
цназа4
3цо
2цп
цп3л
ц1р
ц1с2
цст4
2цт
ц3ту
1цу
цук1
цу4к3р
ц3уп
4ц1ц
ц3ш2
2ць
4ць.
4цьва
ць3вей
ць3вен
4цьвір
3цьвіт
4цьвэ
ць3вян
ць3г
4ць3д
ць3л
ць4ме
ць4мы
ць3п
4ць3с
ць3ц
ць3ш
3цы
цыг3р
цы2зн
цык3
цылё3
цыт3в
цыт1р
цыя4к
цы3ян
1цэ
цэ3а
цэ3дз
цэз2
цэза3р
2цэто
1ц2ю
3цю.
2цюд
2цюж
3цюко
цюс4
3цюх
1ця
3ця.
3цяв
3цягл
цяе4
ця1з
3цяк.
3цякам
3цяко
4цялю.
3цям
3цян
цяпе3р
ця4пл
3цярн
3цяроб
4цярог
3цяру
ця4сл
цят2
3цятк
3цяў
3цях
3цяц
ця3це
3цяч
3цяш
1ча
чаад4к
ча3б2
2чаве
ча3г
ча3да
3чадж
3чадл
ча4д3р
ча2ев
ча2ер
чазь4
2чамл
4чаніл
4чаніў
3чапад
чап3л
ча2пр
ча4р3в
чарна3
ча2с3м
час3та
чась3л
3часьс
чат3в
ч3атра
ча3тры
ча3трэ
ча3ўла
чах3в
ча4х3л
чаць3
чаш3ч
ча2я
2ч3б2
4чв
3ч2вэ
3ч2вя
4ч1ж
2чк
чка3т
ч4ко.
ч2л
ч3леж
2ч3лі
2ч2м
ч3ма
ч3ме
ч3мо
4чмэ
4чн
чна3ў
чна4х3
ч4не.
ч4нес
ч4неш
ч2нём
ч4ніце
ч4ну.
ч4нул
ч4нус
ч4нуў
ч4нуц
1чо
3чоб
3чов
3чон
3чотач
2чп
2чр
4ч1с
4ч1т
1чу
3чу.
чу4га2
чу2д
3чуж
чуп3р
1ч2х4
4ч1ц
4ч1ч
1чы
чы2г3л
чыё4
чык3в
чы4к3р
2чып
чып3л
чыс3та
чых3в
1чэ
3чэз
3чэн
4чэні
4чэнт
4чэня
3чэў
3чэч
3ша
шаб1р
ша1др
ш4а3к
шам3р
ша3пл
ша3с2к
шас3т
шас4тв
шась3
ша3тв
ша4т1р
ша3ўз
шаф3р
ша2х3р
ша3цьв
ша3шч
4шб
2шв
шва4г
шваг3р
ш3вал
ш3ван
ш2вар
ш3вац
3шве
4ш3вы
ш4вы.
4ш3г
4ш3д
4ш3з
2шк4
ш3кав
ш3кап
3шкл
1школ
ш3коў
3шкр
4ш3ку.
2ш2л
3ш4лав
ш4лай
ш4лаю
ш4лая
ш3лев
ш3лее
ш3лен
3шлё
ш4лі.
ш3лім
ш3лін
3ш4ліф
3шліх
ш4ліц
ш4ло
3шлын
ш3лыч
3ш4лю
ш3ля
ш4ляк
1ш2м
ш3маг
ш3мак
шма2т
шмат3к
ш3мац
ш3мач
4ш3ме
ш3мі
ш3мов
ш3мя
2шн
шнаг3
шна4гр
3ш4нар
4шні.
4шнім
4шніх
4шнія
ш3но
ш4ну
4шную
3ш4ныр
4ш3ню
4ш3ня
3шо
ш4п4
3шпа4к3
3шпац
4ш3пр
шпраг3
3шпу
4ш3ра
4ш3с2
ш2т
шт4а
ш3тав
ш3тал
ш4там
ш3тана
ш3тар
2штм
2ш1то
штод4
шт3ро
3штуд
3штур
1шу
3шу.
3шуб
4ш3у2д
3шуе
3шул
шу3мо
ш3уст
шуст3р
3шуч
3шую
4ш3х
4ш3ц
ш4цк
2ш1ч
4шч.
3шчаб
4шчаве
4шчаг
4ш3чае
4ш3чай
4шчак
4шчам.
4ш3чан
ш2чап
ш2час
4ш3чаў
4шчах
ш3чацц
ш3чаць
4ш3чаю
4шчая
3шчол
4шчу.
3шчуп
3шчур
4ш3чус
4шчую
4ш3чы.
ш3чым.
4ш3чын
3шчып
ш3чыс
3шчыт
ш3чыў
4шчых
ш3чыц
4ш3чыш
4шчыя
ш2чэ
4шчэў
4шчэц
4ш3ш2
3шы
ш3ымк
ш3ынд
ш3ынф
3шэ
шэ4ек
шэй3с2
ь1
ьа4
ь2б2
ьбаап3
ьбат3р
ьба3ш
ь4бе
ь4б3л
ь3бо
ь4бог
ь3бу
ь3бы
ь2в
ь3ва
ь4ве.
ь3віг
ь3вім
ь4віне
ь3віць
ь3віш.
ь3ву
ь3вы
ь3вэ
ь4вю
ь3вяць
ь4вяш
ьга4с1
ь3г4л
ьг4н
ь3гр
ь2д
ь3да
ь3дж
ьдзь4
ьд4кр
ь3до
ь3ды
ь3дэ
ь4езд
ье4л
ь3ен
ье1ра
ь2ес
ье2х
ь2ец
ь2еш
ь3ё2д
ь2ём
ьза4с
ь3зё
ь3зь
ь3зю
ь4зял
ь4зян
ь4зяў
ь4зяц
ь2і
ь3ік3
ь3іс
ь3ка
ька4гр
ька3п
ька3т
ьк3л
ь3ко
ько2г3
ь2л
ь3лев
ь4лед
ь3лек
ь3лем
ь3лен
ь4леп
ь3леў
ь3лёк
ь3лён
ь4ліз
ь3лім.
ь3ліс
ь3ліх
ь3ліш
ь3ло
ь4ль
ь3ляды
ь3ляй
ь3ляр
ь3лясь
ь3ляш
ь2м
ь3ма
ьма3с
ь4менак
ь4менк
ь4менц
ь4мены
ьміг4
ьмі3гр
ь3мід
ьмі3з
ь3мі1с4
ь4мк
ь4м4л
ь3мо
ь4мс
ь3мы
ь4мян
ь4мяш
ьна3г
ьна3д
ьна3т
ьна3ў
ь4не3д
ьне4п3р
ь4ніжа
ь4нім
ь4ніш
ь2но
ь3ноў
ь2няк
ьняп3р
ь2п
ь3пек
ь4пім
ь4піцц
ь3по
ь3пр
ь3пу
ь3пэ
ь4сес
ь2сец
ь2сеш
ь2сё
ь4сіс
ь4сіц
ь4ск
ь2с2т
ьсь4
ь4сяк
ь4сяц
ь4та2з
ьт3азі
ьта3п
ьт3р
ьтф2
ь4тым
ь4тын
ьты3п
ьу4
ьфэ3
ь3хл
ь4ху
ь4целе
ь4цель
ь4целя
ь2цен
ь4ценн
ь4ценц
ь4цепв
ьце3с
ь2цё
ь3цё.
ь3цёс
ь2ціг
ьці3зн
ь4ціл.
ь4цілам
ь4ціле
ь4цілц
ь2цір
ь2ціх
ьць4к
ь4цьц
ь2ця
ьця3т
ь2ш
ьш2к
ьш3п
ьш3т
ь3шу
ьэ4
ь2ю4
ь3юн
ь4ю3т
ь4яв
ья2д
ь3яз
ь3я2р
ь3яс
ья4сі
ь3ят
ьят3р
ь4яў
ь2яц
ь3яці
ы1а4
ыан2
ыах3
ыб2
ыба4зн
ыбі2я
ыб3ля
ы3бр
ыбу3чы
ы2бын
ыб'4
ывы4к4л
ывыч4
ыга4сл
ыгваз3
ыг3ло
ы4глы
ыг4не
ы2гр
ы2ґ
ы3ґа
ы1д2
ы3да
ыда2с
ыд4б
ыд3л
ыд4м
ыд3н
ыд4ня
ы3до
ы4драй.
ы4драю
ы4дры
ы3ду
ыдэрас4
ы3е
ые4д
ые4л
ые4м
ые1ра
ые4сі
ые2х
ы1ёз
ы3ёзн
ыё3к4
ыё4ме
ыё4мы
ы1ён
ы3ённ
ыё3пл
ыё1с4
ы3ётк
ыё3ў4
ыё3х
ы3ёцк
ыё3ш
ы1ж
ы3ж4д
ыж4м
ыж3н
ы1з2
ыза4к
ызак3р
ызана3
ыза4пр
ыза4с
ыз3аса
ы4зб
ыз4в
ыз3га
ыз4гн
ызі1я
ы2з3л
ы4з3м
ы4знам
ы4знас
ы4зь
ызь3н
ы1і2
ыіг3
ы2ія
ыка3пр
ык3вал
ы3квар
ы4клу
ы4клы
ык3н
ы3кр
ы4крам
ы4крац
ы4края
ы4крыя
2ыл
ыла3х
ы3лё
ыль3в
ы3мг
1ымпэ
ы3м4р
ымсь3
ым4х
ы2н
ына4г3р
ына4сп
2ынг
ы3нё
ы3но
1ынф
ы3ню
ы3ня
ы1о
ыпа4к
ыпак3л
ыпась3
ыпат3р
ыпа4х
ыпе3ра
ып4р
ып4са
ы3ра
ыра3за
ыра3ск
ыр2ві
ыр3сп
ы1ру
ы1ры
ыры4з
ыса4с
ы1с4в
ыс2к
ыс3кав
ыс3кап
ыс3каў
ыс3каф
ы4скі
ыс2п
ы4спай
ы4спаў.
ысп4л
ыс3пра
ы4с3пы
ыс3пэ
ыс4с
ыста3п
ыс4тат
ыс4тэк
ы2сф
ысь4н
ысь4сі
ы1т
ыта4тр
ыта4хр
ыт4кал
ыт4кас
ы4тн
ыт4но
ытра4пл
ыт3ро
ыт4ром
ыт4рыц
ыт3рэй
ы4тч
ы4ў
ыўз3д
ыўзь3
ыў2ра
ыў3с4т
ыф4ры
ы1х
ыха3с
ыха3т
ых3ле
ых3лі
ых4лы
ых3ля
ы3хм
ы2хр
ых3ро
2ыц
ы3це
ы1цм
ыць4м
ы4чк
ы4ш3ад
ы4шк
ыш2ко
ыш4лы
ыш3моц
ы4шн
ы1шп
ы4ш3пл
ы1шр
ыш3та
ы4ш3то
ы4ш3тр
ы4ш3тэ
ы3шу2
ы4ш3ур
ы4шус
ыш2чо
ы4ш3чу
ы4шым
ы1э4
ы1я
ы3ябат
ы2явы
ы3яга
ы3ягн
ы3я2д
ыя4зі.
ы4якар
ыя3кр
ы4яліт
ы4яліц
ыя4мак
ы3ямат
ы3ямэн
ы4янай
ы4янаю
ыя3п4
ы3ярн
ы2яс2
ы3яса
ыя3ска
ыяс3п
ыя3тв
ы2ятэ
ы2я3ўс
ы2яхо
ы4яю4
ыя4юч
э2
эа1
э1а3б2
э3ага
э3агуе
эа3д2
э3адым
э4ака
э4акі
эа3кр
эа2ку
э1ал
э3алі
э3аль
э3амб
э3ан
э4ана
эа3п
э3апал
э3ар
эас2
эа3ск
эас4п
эа2ст
э3ата
э3атк
эат1р
эа4тра
эа3ў4
эа3ф
э3бо
эб1р
эбра3з
э3бу
э3бя
э3в
эвае3
э3га
эга3с
эг3л
э3го
эг3р
э3гу
э3ґ
э3д2а
эд3а4гл
эда4ль
э3джы
э4дзь
эдне3
э3до
эд3р
э3д2у
э3ды
э4дын
эд3ынс
эды4як
эды4я3л
эдыяль4
эдыян4
эды4яна
эды4янн
э3дэ
э3е
эе1ра
э3ё
э3жа
э3жу
э3жы
э3за
эз1а2р
эз3д
э3зе
э3зі
эзі3ёл
э3зо
э3зу
эзь3
э3зыд
эз1ын
э3зю
э3зя
э3і
эйс2т
э3ка
эка2г
экаг3р
экан4в
экас4
эк3в
эк3д
1экз
э3кі
эк3л
эк3м
э3ко
э4к3р
эк4сым
э3ку
э3ла
э3ле
элеа3х
эле3г
эле1с
эле3сц
э3лё
э3лі
э3лу
э3лы
э3лю
э3ля
эля4г3р
э3ма
эма3г
э3ме
э3мі
эмі3ё
э3мо
э3му
э3мы
э3мя
эна3г
эна4кл
эн3кр
э3но
эн3шт
э3ню
э3ня
э3о
э4оз
э3пе
э3пі
эп3л
э3по
эп3р
эп3с
э3пу
э3пы
э3пэ
э3пя
э3ра
эра3с4п
эра4тр
эра4ў
эраўс3
э4р3в
эрк4
э3ро
эр3пл
эрсь3
эр3тр
э3ру
эру4п
эр3упа
э3ры
эры4ёза
эрыс3к
э3рэ
эрэ4а3
эр1э4л
э4рэ4м
э3се
эс3ка
эс3ко
эск3р
эс3л
эс3м
э3со
эсп3л
эс4таб
эста3п
эст1р
э3су
эс4ш
эсь3
э4сьс
э3сы
э3та
этас3т
э3то
эт3р
этраль4
эт4ран
этра3с
этра4т
э3ту
э3тэ
э3у
эў3д
эў3ж
эўма3
эў3р
эўра1
эўраў4
эўт3р
эфаля4
э3фо
эф3р
э3фэ
э3ха
эха2г
э4х3ат
эх3в
э3хе
э3хі
э3хл
эх1р
э3ца
эца2д
эца4м
эц3аўт
эц3в
э3це
э3ці
э4цын
э3цэ
э3ця
э3ча
э3чу
э3чы
э4шв
э3шу
э3э4
э3ю
э1я1
э3яй
эя2к
э3ям
э3ян
э3яў
э3ях
1ю
ю3а1
юа4н
юара3
юарэ1
юб1р
юб2с
юві1
ю1д
ю3да
юда4п3
ю3е
4юе.
ю3ё
ю1жэ
ю3зе
ю1зі
ю3зы
ю1зю
ю1і
юк3в
юм3ч
ю2н
юнга4
юн4гам
ю3ня
ю1о3
2ю1ра4
юрак3
ю2ро
юрп1
ю1ру
ю1ры
ю1с
ю2ст1
ю2сь
ютак3
ю1ту
4юф
юха4с
юх3в
юх3к4
юх1р
ю1ч
ю3чы.
юш3ча
ю1э
ю3ю
4юю.
юю4б
ю1я
2я1а4
2яб
яб2ля
яб1р
3ябэ
2яве
я3від
я3віт
2я3во
2яву
явыш4
2яг
я2г3л
яг4ляд
яг3н
яг3раб
я4гру
я4гры
яг4ш3
ядаш3
я1д4б
я1дж
я3дзе.
яд2р
яд3ры
яд4у
я3ды
2я3дэ
2я1е
4яе.
яе4ч
я1ё
я1жа
яж2в
яж3н
я1жу
2я1жэ
2яза
яз3а4т
яз3б
яз3в
яз3ды
я1зе4
яз3ев
я1зё
я1з2ж
я3зі
яз2л
яз3н
я3зу
язь3
я3зье
я2зы
я1зю
я1зя
2я1і
яі2з
яка3б
я3кад
я3кал
я3каў
яка3ўв
я3кве
як3л
я3к4ля
я2км
як3н
я3коў
2я3кош
2якр
як3ру
як3рыч
я3крэ
яла1з
2ялай
2ялё
4ялізі
2ялін
яльма4
2ялю
2яля
2яма
яма4п3
4ямат.
4ямата
4ямату
я3мі
ямі3г4
ямі3з
ямі3к4
я4мк
ям3нё
2ямо
ям3р
2яму
ям3ч
2ямэ
яна4ст
янат3в
ян2д
ян3ды
янеч4к
4яніі
4янію
4янія
2яно
2янук
я3ня
я3о
2яп
3япазо
яп3л
яп3ру
яп4с
яп3су
я1ра
яра2с
ярас3л
я3рат
я4р3в
я4рж
яр2жу
2я3ро
я1ру
я1ры
я3рын
яры3ск
я3рыт
я3рыя
я3рэз
2яса
яса3п
я3скап
яск3ва
яс3коч
яс3кр
я2с3л
яс3н
яс4паз
я3с4тат
яс4тац
я2ств
яст3ра
2ясх
яс3хв
я4сьл
я1т
2ятв
ят1р
ят2ра
я3ту
3ятэз
1ятэк
1ятэч
я3у
я4ўд
яў3ж
яў4зн
яў4зь
2яўло
яў3п
я4ўс
яўс3х
яў3х
2я3ф2
яф3рэ
я1х
я3хв
2яхі
я3хл
2яхр
я3ці
яці3з
яці3п
яці1с
яці3ск
2яцэ
я1ч
2яшл
я1шлю
яш3м
2я1э4
2яю
2я1я
яя4в
яя2д
яя2к
яя2с
2'1
'е4л
'е1ра
'2ес
'2еф
'е2х
'2ец
'2еш
'ё4м
'3ёмі
'3ёмн
'3і
'і4н
'2ю2
'ю4б
'ю4д
'ю3ч
'4яб
'я2ві
'я4д
'3ям
'я2р
'2я4с
'2яц
'я2ч
